Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1675
Act; neglect or failure by officers; contempt of court.

If any jury commissioner or deputy jury commissioner, sheriff or deputy sheriff, or person having charge of election records neglects or fails to perform the duties imposed by the Jury Selection Act, the person so offending shall be guilty of contempt of court.

R.S.1867, Code § 667, p. 511;

R.S.1913, § 8146;

C.S.1922, § 9081;

C.S.1929, § 20-1611;

R.S.1943, § 25-1611;

Laws 1953, c. 72, § 5, p. 226;

Laws 1979, LB 234, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1611;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 32.